New York, session 2025-2026, A1899.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 58 of the civil 2 service law, including the age requirements under paragraph (a) of 3 subdivision 1 of such section, or any other provision of law to the 4 contrary, Kevin Donohue, who has been continuously employed by the town 5 of Goshen, in the county of Orange, as a part-time police officer, shall 6 be eligible to take the competitive civil service examination for the 7 position of police officer and shall, contingent upon his score on such 8 examination, be eligible to be placed on the eligible list for appoint- 9 ment as a full-time police officer with the town of Goshen police 10 department. 11 § 2. Kevin Donohue shall otherwise be subject to the merit and fitness 12 provisions of the civil service law applicable to full-time police offi- 13 cers. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04963-01-5